Rhode Island statutes. Title 13 Criminals — Correctional Institutions
Chapter 5 Station Houses for Women

13-5-1.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Police station” includes any place where persons are temporarily confined under arrest; and

“Woman” includes any person of the female sex.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 293, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 362, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 415, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-1

.

13-5-2.
Designation of station houses.

The city or town council in every city or town in this state, except the council of the city of Pawtucket, shall designate one or more station houses within their respective cities or towns for the detention of all women under arrest. The city or town council may, at any time, so designate any additional station house or houses, and may declare any station house or houses to be no longer so designated; provided, at least one station house shall always remain so designated in each city or town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 293, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 362, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1910, ch. 626, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 415, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-2

.

13-5-3.
Appointment, removal, and duties of matrons.

The police chief of every city or town shall appoint at least one woman who shall be known as a police matron. The public safety commission of the city of Providence shall appoint at least two (2) women who shall be known as police matrons. A police matron shall not be appointed for any definite term, but may hold office until removal. She may be removed at any time for cause by the appointing body, by a written order stating the cause of removal. Police matrons shall assist with the confinement of all female prisoners.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 293, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 362, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 415, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-3

; P.L. 1988, ch. 262, § 1.

13-5-4.
Hours of duty of matrons.

The respective hours of service of the police matrons shall be so arranged by the authorities in charge of the police department that:

In the city of Providence, at least one matron shall be on duty at all hours of the day and night; and

In each of the other cities or towns one matron shall be near to and within call of each designated police station at all hours.

Every police matron:

In the city of Providence shall, during her hours of service, remain constantly on duty at the station at which she serves; and

In each of the other cities or towns shall reside at or near the station to which she is attached, and shall hold herself in readiness to answer any call from the station during her hours of service, so long as any woman remains confined at the station.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 293, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 362, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 415, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-4

.

13-5-5.
Care of female prisoners by matron.

The police matron shall have, subject only to the general control of the head of the police department, the entire care of all women held under arrest in the station in which she serves or to which she is attached, and may at any time call upon any police officer in the station for assistance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 293, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 362, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 415, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-6

.

13-5-6.
Accommodations for female prisoners.

In every station in which a police matron serves, or to which a police matron is attached, sufficient and proper accommodations shall be provided for women confined under arrest. In case those accommodations shall be insufficient or improper, the matron shall notify the police chief, and it shall be the duty of the police chief to notify the city or town council. It shall be the duty of the city or town council to provide, at the expense of the city or town, sufficient and proper accommodations.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 293, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 362, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 415, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-6

; P.L. 1988, ch. 262, § 1.

13-5-7.
Summons of matron on arrest of woman — Removal to designated station house.

Whenever, in any city or town where any police matron shall be appointed under this chapter, a woman is arrested and taken to a police station to which a matron is attached, and where the matron is not then present, it shall be the duty of the officer in charge of the station to cause the matron to be immediately summoned. Whenever, in any city or town in which a police matron has been appointed, a woman is arrested and taken to the station house to which no matron is attached, it shall be the duty of the officer in charge to cause the woman prisoner to be removed, as soon as possible, to the nearest station house to which a police matron is attached.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 293, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 362, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 415, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-7

.

13-5-8.
Attendance of matrons in court.

At least one police matron in each city or town shall be designated by the chief of police of the city or town to attend before the district and police courts at all times when any woman is to be arraigned before the court, and that matron shall have charge of all women there in attendance awaiting trial or transfer from the court to any other place of detention.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 293, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 362, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 415, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-8

.

13-5-9.
Salary of matrons.

The salary of the police matrons in each city or town shall be fixed by the city or town council.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 293, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 362, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 415, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-9

.

13-5-10.
Special statutes saved.

The provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of any special statutes relating to any particular town or city, none of which is repealed by the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 338, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

13-5-10

.